Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Claims Against the State or State Employees.

Sec. 09.50.250.
Actionable claims against the state.

A person or corporation having a contract, quasi-contract, or tort claim against the state may bring an action against the state in a state court that has jurisdiction over the claim. A person who may present the claim under AS 44.77 may not bring an action under this section except as set out in AS

44.77.040(c)

. A person who may bring an action under AS

36.30.560

—

36.30.695

may not bring an action under this section except as set out in AS

36.30.685

. However, an action may not be brought if the claim

is an action for tort, and is based upon an act or omission of an employee of the state exercising due care in the execution of a statute or regulation, whether or not the statute or regulation is valid; or is an action for tort, and based upon the exercise or performance or the failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or duty on the part of a state agency or an employee of the state, whether or not the discretion involved is abused;

is for damages caused by the imposition or establishment of, or the failure to impose or establish, a quarantine or isolation, or by other actions, by the state or its agents, officers, or employees under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

, except for damages caused by negligent medical treatment provided under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

by a state employee, or except that, if a state employee quarantines or isolates a person with gross negligence or in intentional violation of AS

18.15.385

, the state shall pay to the person who was quarantined or isolated a penalty of $500 for each day of the improper quarantine;

arises out of assault, battery, false imprisonment, false arrest, malicious prosecution, abuse of process, libel, slander, misrepresentation, deceit, or interference with contract rights;

arises out of the use of an ignition interlock device certified under AS

33.05.020(c)

; or

arises out of injury, illness, or death of a seaman that occurs or manifests itself during or in the course of, or arises out of, employment with the state; AS 23.30 provides the exclusive remedy for such a claim, and no action may be brought against the state, its vessels, or its employees under the Jones Act (46 U.S.C. 30104 — 30105), in admiralty, or under the general maritime law.

History.

(§ 26.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1965; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1992; am § 9 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 2005; am § 12 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes reinserted “in a state court that has jurisdiction over the claim” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a), which language was added by sec. 9, ch. 32, SLA 1997.
When subsection (a) was amended by sec. 1, ch. 30, SLA 2003, the language was omitted, but was not shown as being deleted.

Cross references. —

For presentation of claims against state, see AS

44.77.010

; for state as party, see AS

44.80.010

; for counterclaims against state, see Civ.
R. 13(d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 30, SLA 2003 provides that the 2003 addition of paragraph (5) of this section “applies to claims or causes of action accruing on or after July 1, 2003,” and that “[n]othing in [that amendment] affects the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2003.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 30, SLA 2003 (SB 120), which added paragraph (5) to this section, see 2003 Senate Journal 409—410.

Opinions of attorney general. —

By its waiver of immunity in this section, it must be concluded that the state may be sued for negligent torts which arise under the Jones Act.
It is true that under the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act, employers, including the state (AS

23.30.265

[now AS

23.30.395

]), are excluded from admiralty liability.
However, this exclusive liability provision cannot act as a limitation on suits against the state under the federal maritime law once the state has unqualifiedly waived its immunity for negligent torts. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

Hence, all employees on the Alaska ferry system who meet the classification of seamen or members of the crew within the scope of the Jones Act have an exclusive federal remedy within the terms of the Jones Act to the exclusion of the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act, except as to those injuries that occur in a situation of only local concern or fall within the “twilight zone” between local and federal jurisdiction. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

By waiving its immunity under this section, the state stands in the position of a private party and cannot limit its tort liability by a general provision in the Workmen’s Compensation Act.
So much of AS

23.30.055

as limits the liability of employers in admiralty must be considered an invalid infringement on the federal jurisdiction. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

If it is the desire of the state to limit its tort liability to the Workmen’s Compensation Act, it may do so by legislative enactment of an exception to the waiver of sovereign immunity contained in this section. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

Sec. 09.50.253.
Actionable claims against state employees.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, the remedy against the state provided by AS

09.50.250

for injury or loss of property or personal injury or death arising or resulting from an act or omission of a state employee while acting within the scope of the employee’s office or employment is exclusive of any other civil action or proceeding for money damages by reason of the same subject matter against the employee whose act or omission gave rise to the claim or against the estate of the employee. Any other civil action or proceeding for money damages arising out of or relating to the same subject matter against the employee or the employee’s estate is precluded without regard to when the act or omission occurred.

A state employee against whom a civil action or proceeding is brought under (a) of this section shall deliver all pleadings and process served upon the employee, or a copy of the papers served, to the person designated by the head of the employee’s agency to receive the papers and to the attorney general. The state employee shall deliver these documents within the time period established by the attorney general in a regulation adopted under this section. The initial delivery of these documents to the attorney general constitutes an agreement by the employee to cooperate with the attorney general in the state employee’s defense of the action or proceeding and a consent that the attorney general conduct the defense as the attorney general considers advisable and in the best interests of the employee, including settlement in the attorney general’s discretion.

Upon certification by the attorney general that the state employee was acting within the scope of the employee’s office or employment at the time of the incident out of which the claim arose, any civil action or proceeding commenced upon the claim in a state court is considered an action or proceeding against the state under the provisions of this title, and the state is substituted as the party defendant. The civil action or proceeding certified under this subsection is subject to the same limitations and defenses applicable to an action or proceeding against the state. The attorney general or the attorney general’s designee shall defend the civil action or proceeding on behalf of the state.

If the attorney general refuses to make the certification under (c) of this section, the state employee may, at any time before trial, petition the superior court to find and certify that the employee was acting within the scope of the employee’s office or employment at the time of the incident out of which the claim arose. Upon certification by the court, the civil action is considered to be a civil action or proceeding brought against the state under the provisions of this title, and the state is substituted as the party defendant. Upon certification by the court, the state shall reimburse the state employee the employee’s reasonable costs and attorney fees incurred in bringing the petition. A copy of the petition under this subsection shall be served upon the state in accordance with the provisions of Rule 4(d)(7), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. The petition to the superior court is the exclusive remedy to challenge the noncertification decision by the attorney general of a state employee under this section.

A claim or suit for damages may not be filed against the state or the attorney general arising out of the process for certification under this section.

This section does not extend or apply to a civil action or proceeding against an employee of the state that is brought for a violation of the Constitution of the United States or that is brought for a violation of a law of the state under which an action or proceeding against an employee is expressly authorized.

The provisions of this section are in addition to and do not supersede a term in a state employee collective bargaining agreement addressing legal defense and indemnity.

In this section,

“acting within the scope of the employee’s office or employment” means acts or omissions

that the state employee is employed or authorized to perform;

of the state employee that occur substantially within the authorized time and space limit;

that are activated by a purpose to serve the state; and

that do not constitute acting, or failing to act, with wilful, reckless, or intentional misconduct, or with gross negligence or malice;

“state employee”

means

does not include an employee of

the University of Alaska;

the Alaska Railroad Corporation; or

a political subdivision of the state, including a regional educational attendance area.

a permanent, probationary, seasonal, temporary, provisional, or nonpermanent employee in the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government, whether in the classified, partially exempt, or exempt service; or

(ii)

a person appointed to a board or commission of state government;

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For actionable claims against state employees, see 9 AAC 33.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 94, SLA 2004, provides that this section “applies to a cause of action that arose on or after June 26, 2004.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 94, SLA 2004 (SB 338), authorizing substitution of the state for a state employee named as a defendant in a civil action when the employee is sued for an act that occurred in the course and scope of employment, see 2004 Senate Journal 2181 - 2182.

Sec. 09.50.260.
Undertaking. [Repealed, § 2 ch 19 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 09.50.270.
Payment of judgment against the state.

An attachment or execution may not issue against the state. When a final judgment is rendered against the state in an action, the clerk of the court shall immediately transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the Department of Administration which shall either approve payment of the judgment against the state if a sufficient appropriation exists for payment, or audit the amount and transmit a copy to the legislature with the recommendation that an appropriation be made for its payment.

History.

(§ 26.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “An attachment or execution may not” was substituted for “No attachment or execution shall” in order to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.50.280.
Judgment for plaintiff; punitive damages.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, it shall be for the legal amount found due from the state with interest as provided under AS

09.30.070

and without punitive damages.

History.

(§ 26.04 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 1965; am § 20 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For interest on judgments, see AS

09.30.070

; for legal rate of interest, see AS

45.45.010

. For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.50.290.
Trial by court. [Repealed, § 1 ch 147 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 09.50.300.
Compromise by attorney general.

Except as provided in AS

09.50.253

, the attorney general may, with the approval of the court, arbitrate, compromise, or settle any action filed under AS

09.50.250

—

09.50.300

.

History.

(§ 26.06 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 2004)